Utah, session 2026, SB34.
Section 1. Section 53E-1-102 is amended to read:53E-1-102Effective 05/06/26. Public education code definitions.Unless otherwise indicated, as used in this title, Title 53F, Public Education System -- Funding, and Title 53G, Public Education System -- Local Administration:(1)"Bullying" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53G-9-601.(2)"Charter agreement" means an agreement made in accordance with Section 53G-5-303 that authorizes the operation of a charter school.(3)"Charter school governing board" means the board that governs a charter school.(4)"District school" means a public school under the control of a local school board.(5)"General control and supervision" means, including as used in Utah Constitution, Article X, Section 3, that the state board shall direct and manage all aspects of the public education system in accordance with laws the Legislature makes, including in relation to compliance and monitoring of an LEA under Section 53E-3-401.(5)(6)"Individualized education program" or "IEP" means a written statement for a student with a disability that is developed, reviewed, and revised in accordance with the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.(6)(7)"LEA governing board" means:(a)for a school district, the local school board;(b)for a charter school, the charter school governing board; or(c)for the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind, the state board.(7)(8)"Local education agency" or "LEA" means:(a)a school district;(b)a charter school; or(c)the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind.(8)(9)"Local school board" means a board elected under Title 20A, Chapter 14, Part 2, Election of Members of Local Boards of Education.(9)(10)"Minimum School Program" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53F-2-102.(10)(11)"Parent" means a parent or legal guardian.(11)(12)"Public education code" means:(a)this title;(b)Title 53F, Public Education System -- Funding; and(c)Title 53G, Public Education System -- Local Administration.(12)(13)"Section 504 accommodation plan" means a plan developed in accordance with Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 701 et seq., for a student with a disability, to meet the student's educational needs and ensure equitable access to a free appropriate public education.(13)(14)"School nurse" means a registered nurse:(a)who holds:(i)a license under Title 58, Chapter 31b, Nurse Practice Act; or(ii)a multistate license as that term is defined in Section 58-31e-102; and(b)whose primary role is the care of a defined group of students enrolled in the public school system.(14)(15)"State board" means the State Board of Education.(15)(16)"State superintendent" means the state superintendent of public instruction appointed under Section 53E-3-301.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 53E-1-203 is amended to read:53E-1-203Effective 05/06/26. State Superintendent's Annual Report.(1)The state board shall prepare and submit to the governor, the Education Interim Committee, and the Public Education Appropriations Subcommittee, by January 15 of each year, an annual written report known as the State Superintendent's Annual Report that includes:(a)the operations, activities, programs, and services of the state board;(b)subject to Subsection (4)(b), all reports listed in Subsection (4)(a); and(c)data on the general condition of the schools with recommendations considered desirable for specific programs, including:(i)a complete statement of fund balances;(ii)a complete statement of revenues by fund and source;(iii)a complete statement of adjusted expenditures by fund, the status of bonded indebtedness, the cost of new school plants, and school levies;(iv)a complete statement of state funds allocated to each school district and charter school by source, including supplemental appropriations, and a complete statement of expenditures by each school district and charter school, including supplemental appropriations, by function and object as outlined in the United States Department of Education publication "Financial Accounting for Local and State School Systems";(v)a statement that includes data on:(A)fall enrollments;(B)average membership;(C)high school graduates;(D)all employees, including data reported by school districts on educator ratings described in Section 53G-11-511;(E)pupil-teacher ratios;(F)average class sizes;(G)average salaries;(H)applicable private school data; and(I)data from statewide assessments described in Section 53E-4-301 for each school and school district;(vi)statistical information for each school district and charter school regarding:(A)student attendance by grade level;(B)the percentage of students chronically absent;(C)the percentage of student excused absences; and(D)the percentage of student unexcused absences;(vii)statistical information regarding incidents of delinquent activity in the schools, at school-related activities, on school buses, and at school bus stops; and(viii)other statistical and financial information about the school system that the state superintendent considers pertinent.(2)(a)For the purposes of Subsection (1)(c)(v):(i)the pupil-teacher ratio for a school shall be calculated by dividing the number of students enrolled in a school by the number of full-time equivalent teachers assigned to the school, including regular classroom teachers, school-based specialists, and special education teachers;(ii)the pupil-teacher ratio for a school district shall be the median pupil-teacher ratio of the schools within a school district;(iii)the pupil-teacher ratio for charter schools aggregated shall be the median pupil-teacher ratio of charter schools in the state; and(iv)the pupil-teacher ratio for the state's public schools aggregated shall be the median pupil-teacher ratio of public schools in the state.(b)The report shall:(i)include the pupil-teacher ratio for:(A)each school district;(B)the charter schools aggregated; and(C)the state's public schools aggregated; and(ii)identify a website where pupil-teacher ratios for each school in the state may be accessed.(3)For each operation, activity, program, or service provided by the state board, the annual report shall include:(a)a description of the operation, activity, program, or service;(b)data and metrics:(i)selected and used by the state board to measure progress, performance, effectiveness, and scope of the operation, activity, program, or service, including summary data; and(ii)that are consistent and comparable for each state operation, activity, program, or service;(c)budget data, including the amount and source of funding, expenses, and allocation of full-time employees for the operation, activity, program, or service;(d)historical data from previous years for comparison with data reported under Subsections (3)(b) and (c);(e)goals, challenges, and achievements related to the operation, activity, program, or service;(f)relevant federal and state statutory references and requirements;(g)contact information of officials knowledgeable and responsible for each operation, activity, program, or service; and(h)other information determined by the state board that:(i)may be needed, useful, or of historical significance; or(ii)promotes accountability and transparency for each operation, activity, program, or service with the public and elected officials.(4)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (4)(b), the annual report shall also include:(i)the report described in Section 53E-3-507 by the state board on career and technical education needs and program access;(ii)the report described in Section 53E-3-515 by the state board on the Hospitality and Tourism Management Career and Technical Education Pilot Program;(iii)the report described in Section 53E-3-516 by the state board on certain incidents that occur on school grounds;(iv)the report described in Section 53E-4-202 by the state board on the development and implementation of the core standards for Utah public schools;(v)the report described in Section 53E-5-310 by the state board on school turnaroundimprovement and leadership development;(vi)the report described in Section 53E-10-308 by the state board and Utah Board of Higher Education on student participation in the concurrent enrollment program;(vii)the report described in Section 53F-5-506 by the state board on information related to personalized, competency-based learning;(viii)the report described in Section 53G-8-20353G-8-301 by the state board on LEAs' policies and procedures related to physical restraint and interventions; and(ix)the report described in Section 53G-9-802 by the state board on dropout prevention and recovery services.(b)The Education Interim Committee or the Public Education Appropriations Subcommittee may request a report described in Subsection (4)(a) to be reported separately from the State Superintendent's Annual Report.(5)The annual report shall be designed to provide clear, accurate, and accessible information to the public, the governor, and the Legislature.(6)The state board shall:(a)submit the annual report in accordance with Section 68-3-14; and(b)make the annual report, and previous annual reports, accessible to the public by placing a link to the reports on the state board's website.(7)(a)Upon request of the Education Interim Committee or Public Education Appropriations Subcommittee, the state board shall present the State Superintendent's Annual Report to either committee.(b)After submitting the State Superintendent's Annual Report in accordance with this section, the state board may supplement the report at a later time with updated data, information, or other materials as necessary or upon request by the governor, the Education Interim Committee, or the Public Education Appropriations Subcommittee.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 53E-8-204 is amended to read:53E-8-204Effective 05/06/26. Authority of the state board -- Rulemaking -- Superintendent -- Advisory council.(1)(a)The state board is the governing board of the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind.(b)The state board shall, as the state board determines necessary, establish committees, policies, or processes necessary to the function and oversight of the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind.(2)(a)The state board shall appoint a superintendent for the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind.(a)With the approval of the state board, the state superintendent of public instruction shall appoint and supervise a superintendent of the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind who reports directly to the state superintendent.(b)The state board shall make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, regarding the qualifications, terms of employment, and duties of the superintendent for the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind.(3)The superintendent shall:(a)subject to the approval of the state board, appoint an associate superintendent to administer the Utah School for the Deaf based on:(i)demonstrated competency as an expert educator of deaf persons; and(ii)knowledge of school management and the instruction of deaf persons; and(b)subject to the approval of the state board, appoint an associate superintendent to administer the Utah School for the Blind based on:(i)demonstrated competency as an expert educator of blind persons; and(ii)knowledge of school management and the instruction of blind persons, including an understanding of the unique needs and education of deafblind persons.(4)The state board shall:(a)approve the annual budget and expenditures of the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind; and(b)administer the financial operations of the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind.(5)(a)The state board shall submit a report in accordance with Section 53E-1-201 on the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind.(b)The state board shall ensure that the report described in Subsection (5)(a) includes:(i)a financial report;(ii)a report on Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind programs and activities; and(iii)a report of student academic performance.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 53E-10-310 is amended to read:53E-10-310Effective 05/06/26. Utah first credential program.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Eligible institution" means an institution of higher education as defined in Section 53H-1-101.(b)"First credential" means a certificate awarded by the state board to an eligible student who meets the criteria described in Subsection (7).(c)(i)"Industry-recognized credential" means a credential that is:(A)developed and offered by, or endorsed by, a nationally recognized industry association or organization representing a sizable portion of the industry sector;(B)sought or accepted by employers within the industry or sector as a recognized, preferred, or required credential for recruitment, screening, hiring, retention, or advancement purposes; and(C)regularly reviewed, updated, and validated by the issuing body to ensure ongoing alignment with industry standards and labor market needs.(ii)"Industry-recognized credential" may also include a credential offered through a catalyst center as described in Section 53E-3-507.153F-5-224.(d)"Master credential list" means the list of approved industry-recognized credentials maintained by the state board in accordance with this section.(e)"Program" means the first credential program described in this section.(f)"Technical college" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53H-1-101.(2)The commissioner of higher education, the state superintendent of public instruction, and the governor's education advisor shall establish the First Credential Oversight Committee comprised of:(a)representatives from industries, including:(i)members of professional associations or trade groups; and(ii)employers from high-demand sectors as the state board determines in collaboration with the Utah Board of Higher Education and the Department of Workforce Services;(b)representatives from education including:(i)members from the state board;(ii)the director of the Catalyst Center Grant Program described in Section 53E-3-507.153F-5-224;(iii)LEA administrators, such as a superintendent or charter school director;(iv)professionals from institutions of higher education, including technical colleges;(v)career and technical education specialists; and(vi)Talent Ready Utah; and(c)workforce development experts, including representatives from the Department of Workforce Services.(3)The state board shall staff the First Credential Oversight Committee.(4)The First Credential Oversight Committee shall develop a first credential master plan, which shall include:(a)a framework for developing and maintaining the master credential list;(b)a comprehensive needs assessment framework that evaluates:(i)resources available through institutions of higher education, including:(A)faculty expertise and availability;(B)facilities and equipment;(C)existing certification programs; and(D)potential for program expansion;(ii) industry partnership opportunities, including:(A)geographical proximity to potential partners;(B)willingness of local industries to participate;(C)capacity for work-based learning placements; and(D)alignment between industry needs and educational capabilities; and(iii)general resource availability, including:(A)current funding streams and potential funding sources;(B)existing technology infrastructure;(C)qualified personnel and staffing needs; and(D)professional development requirements;(c)credential approval processes;(d)methods for ensuring industry demand alignment;(e)wage considerations for occupations associated with approved credentials;(f)clear definitions of industry-recognized credentials;(g)strategies for promoting stackability and sequencing of credentials;(h)approaches to ensure regional relevance of credentials;(i)mechanisms for collaboration between educational institutions, industry partners, and workforce development agencies;(j)strategies for continuous evaluation and improvement of the program;(k)the creation of a credentials review committee, including membership and duties;(l)in accordance with Subsection (17), an established framework of planning, implementation, and student outcome performance funding for an LEA administering first credential programming;(m)a weighted system for the master credential list that:(i)assigns higher values to credentials based on:(A)alignment with high-demand, high-wage occupations;(B)incorporation of multiple learning pathways, including coursework, apprenticeships, internships, work-based learning, and related service opportunities;(C)industry recognition and portability; and(D)stackability with other credentials or degrees; and(ii)uses the weighted values to:(A)determine incentive funding levels;(B)prioritize program expansion support; and(C)guide student career planning; and(n)guidelines for LEAs to procure industry-recognized certification program licenses, including:(i)verification that certifications appear on the master credential list;(ii)requirement for competency-based assessments in proctored environments;(iii)documentation of local industry endorsement; and(iv)alignment with state and federal computer science initiatives where applicable, including the Computer Science for Utah Grant Program described in Section 53H-13-306.(5)In accordance with the Utah First Credential Master Plan, the state board shall:(a)ensure that the credentials review committee membership reflects a balance of perspectives and expertise;(b)develop an online application and submission system for credentialing organizations and providers to submit programs for inclusion in the master credential list;(c)establish and maintain the master credential list based on the recommendations of the credentials review committee;(d)develop clear mechanisms for students to understand how earning one credential can lead to higher-level certifications or degrees; and(e)foster partnerships between high schools, technical colleges, employers, and apprenticeship programs to ensure students have access to meaningful work-based learning opportunities.(6)The state board shall:(a)automatically include on the initial master credential list any existing credential that:(i)meets the definition of industry-recognized credential under this section; and(ii)is currently recognized by the state board or Utah Board of Higher Education as of July 1, 2024; and(b)review all automatically included credentials within one year to ensure ongoing compliance with program requirements.(7)The state board shall award a first credential certificate to an eligible student who completes one of the following:(a)concurrent enrollment courses, composed of:(i)between 12 and 18 core general education credits, or as industry standards dictate, with courses from different general education categories; or(ii)a prescribed set of courses as the Utah Board of Higher Education designates;(b)an industry-recognized credential included on the master credential list;(c)300 hours of completion through a youth apprenticeship program that:(i)is described in Sections 35A-6-102 and 35A-6-104.5; and(ii)includes courses that fulfill the requirements for an industry-recognized credential included on the master credential list;(d)completion of a technical college certificate; or(e)completion of a Career and Technical Education Pathway program.(8)The Utah Board of Higher Education shall ensure that credits earned for a first credential certificate are:(a)accepted and transferable to institutions of higher education, including technical colleges;(b)applicable towards relevant degree programs; and(c)recognized by relevant industries as adequate preparation for employment.(9)Subject to legislative appropriations, the Utah Board of Higher Education shall award a first credential scholarship to each student who earns a first credential certificate.(10)The first credential scholarship may be used at the following institutions:(a)an institution of higher education as defined in Section 53H-1-101; or(b)a private, nonprofit college or university in the state that is accredited by the Northwest Commission on Colleges and Universities.(11)The Utah Board of Higher Education shall annually determine the first credential scholarship amount based on:(a)the number of eligible students; and(b)appropriations made by the Legislature.(12)A student may use the first credential scholarship for:(a)tuition and fees;(b)books and supplies; or(c)other educational expenses as  the Utah Board of Higher Education determines.(13)The Utah Board of Higher Education shall ensure the scholarship is valid for use within three years from the date the student graduates from high school.(14)A student may earn the first credential scholarship in addition to any other state-sponsored scholarships for which the student may be eligible.(15)The first credential oversight committee shall present the master plan described in Subsection (4) to the Education Interim Committee by the November 2025 interim committee meeting.(16)Every three years, the First Credential Oversight Committee shall:(a)review the Utah First Credential Master Plan;(b)as needed, create a list of recommendations and update the Utah First Credential Master Plan;(c)report the list of recommendations and the updated Utah First Credential Master Plan to:(i)the state board;(ii)the Utah Board of Higher Education;(iii)the Department of Workforce Services;(iv)the Education Interim Committee; and(v)the Economic Development and Workforce Services Interim Committee.(17)(a)The state board shall administer a first credential grant program for an LEA and award a grant in accordance with the following process.(b)The First Credential Oversight Committee shall establish:(i)a needs assessment tool that evaluates:(A)an LEA's current first credential offering;(B)an LEA's capacity to develop or expand a first credential pathway;(C)resources and support needed for a first credential program, including resources available through institutions of higher education, industry partnership opportunities, and general resource availability; and(D)each potential barrier to implementation; and(ii)a continuum of need to place each applying LEA.(c)An LEA seeking a first credential grant shall submit to the First Credential Oversight Committee:(i)a completed needs assessment; and(ii)a grant application that contains:(A)current first credential data, including current credentials offered;(B)preliminary goals for creating or expanding first credential opportunities within the LEA; and(C)if applicable, plans for procurement of industry certification program licenses, including certification details and alignment with master credential list, documentation of employer endorsements, assessment and proctoring procedures, and integration with existing computer science programs.(d)The First Credential Oversight Committee shall:(i)review each submitted application and needs assessment;(ii)assign the LEA a placement on the continuum of need; and(iii)provide to the LEA a specific requirement for an implementation plan based on:(A)the LEA's continuum placement;(B)each identified area for growth;(C)each available resource; and(D)each additional factor the First Credential Oversight Committee determines relevant.(e)An LEA shall submit to the First Credential Oversight Committee an implementation plan that includes:(i)specific goals for expanding a first credential opportunity;(ii)each implementation step and timeline;(iii)a detailed cost projection; and(iv)each additional element the committee requires based on the needs assessment results.(f)The First Credential Oversight Committee shall:(i)review the implementation plan;(ii)direct technical assistance to the LEA in accordance with the LEA's implementation plan;(iii)provide feedback to the LEA to improve the implementation plan;(iv)approve each implementation plan that meets the established criteria; and(v)award an implementation grant for each approved plan.(g)Subject to legislative appropriations, the state board shall:(i)award an incentive grant to an LEA that:(A)has implemented an approved plan;(B)increases the number of students who earn a first credential certificate; and(C)achieves each established implementation goal; and(ii)in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, and in collaboration with the First Credential Oversight Committee, establish by rule:(A)tiers for incentive grant awards;(B)performance metrics for continued funding;(C)reporting requirements for a grant recipient;(D)requirements for reporting certification program outcomes and industry alignment;(E)procedures for coordinating with computer science initiative grants; and(F)guidelines for certification program procurement and implementation.(18)In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, and in collaboration with the Utah Board of Higher Education and the Department of Workforce Services, the state board shall make rules to implement the provisions of this section.

Section 5:
Section 5. Section 53F-5-218 is amended to read:53F-5-218Effective 05/06/26. Grow Your Own Educator Pipeline Program.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Paraprofessional" means an individual who:(i)works with students in an LEA as a paraprofessional or in a similar teaching assistant position; and(ii)is not licensed to teach.(b)"Program" means the Grow Your Own Educator Pipeline Program that this section creates.(c)"School counselor" means an educator who is:(i)licensed as a school counselor in accordance with state board rule; and(ii)assigned to provide direct and indirect services to students in accordance with a school counseling program model that the state board provides.(d)"School counselor assistant" means a student who is:(i)enrolled in an accredited bachelor's degree program in a related field; and(ii)completing the student's practicum experience in a school counseling department under the supervision of a licensed school counselor.(e)"School counselor intern" means a student who is:(i)enrolled in an accredited school counselor master's degree program; and(ii)completing the student's hours of a supervised counseling internship by applying appropriate school counseling techniques under the supervision of a licensed school counselor.(f)"School psychologist" means an individual:(i)whom the state board licenses to practice as a school psychologist; and(ii)who is assigned to provide direct and indirect services to students within the relevant school or LEA seeking program grant funding.(g)"School social worker" means an individual:(i)whom the state board licenses as a school social worker; and(ii)who is assigned to provide direct and indirect services to students within the relevant school or LEA seeking program grant funding.(h)"Teacher" means an educator who has an assignment to teach in a classroom.(2)The Grow Your Own Educator Pipeline Program is a competitive grant program created to provide funding to LEAs to award scholarships to paraprofessionals, teachers, school counselor assistants, and school counselor interns within the LEA for education and training to become licensed teachers, licensed school counselors, licensed school psychologists, or licensed school social workers.(3)(a)The state board shall use money appropriated for the program to provide funding to LEAs that are awarded grants under the program to award scholarships to eligible candidates.(b)The state board shall:(i)determine the amount of an award an LEA receives under the program; and(ii)prioritize the amount of an award an LEA receives based upon an LEA's identified need.(c)The principal within the participating LEA shall nominate a candidate for the scholarship awarded under this section.(4)An LEA that participates in the program may select a candidate for a scholarship award if:(a)the candidate is a resident of the state; and(b)(i)for a paraprofessional:(A)a school district or a charter school has employed the candidate as a paraprofessional for at least one year before entering the program; or(B)subject to Subsection (5), the candidate has experience outside of the school district, the charter school, or the state that is equivalent to the experience described in Subsection (4)(b)(i)(A);(ii)for a teacher, the candidate:(A)was a paraprofessional who was awarded a scholarship;(B)was offered employment as a teacher before the teacher completed the training to become a professionally licensed teacher; and(C)is working as a teacher for the same LEA where the teacher previously worked as a paraprofessional and was awarded the scholarship;(iii)for a school counselor assistant, the candidate:(A)is enrolled in a bachelor's degree program in a related field; and(B)demonstrates a commitment to continue the school counselor assistant's education after graduation in school counseling;(iv)for a school counselor intern, the candidate is enrolled in a school counselor master's degree program accredited by:(A)the Council for Accreditation of Counseling and Related Educational Programs; or(B)another regionally recognized accrediting body that meets the state board's standards for school counselor education programs;(v)for a school psychologist student, including a student, practicum student, or intern, the candidate is enrolled in a school psychology education specialist or doctorate program that the National Association of School Psychologists accredits; or(vi)for a candidate studying to become a school social worker, including a student or practicum intern, the candidate is enrolled in a masters level social work program that the Council of Social Work Education accredits.(5)The percentage of an LEA's paraprofessional scholarship recipients who are eligible for a scholarship using equivalent experience under Subsection (4)(b)(i)(B) may not exceed 20%.(6)A scholarship award under the program may only be used for:(a)tuition, books, fees, and certification tests for required coursework and licensure;(b)stipends for mentors or school counselor assistants; and(c)if the LEA pays 0.15 of a full-time equivalent and all employee benefits, payment of a 0.35 full-time equivalent for:(i)a paraprofessional, up to one semester of student teachingfour semesters of clinical experience; or(ii)a school counselor assistant or school counselor intern, up to two semesters of practicum or internship hours.(7)An LEA shall ensure that a paraprofessional scholarship recipient is continuously employed as a paraprofessional by the paraprofessional's LEA while pursuing a degree using scholarship money under the program.(8)The state board shall make rules in accordance with this section and Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to administer the program, including rules regarding:(a)grant and scholarship application procedures;(b)procedures for distributing scholarship money;(c)assignment and eligibility of qualified mentors;(d)stipends for mentors or school counselor assistants;(e)administrative costs for regional education service agencies, as that term is defined in Section 53G-4-410; and(f)eligibility requirements for potential candidates for scholarships regarding the completion of the Free Application for Federal Student Aid and the acceptance of other grants, tuition or fee waivers, and scholarships offered to the candidate.

Section 6:
Section 6. Section 53F-5-224, which is renumbered from Section 53E-3-507.1 is renumbered and amended to read:53E-3-507.153F-5-224Effective 05/06/26. Applied Professional Education Experience Grant Program.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Advisory board" means a group of individuals, which may include industry, postsecondary, and community representatives, that reviews program direction and ensures alignment with workforce needs.(a)(b)"CatalystApplied professional education experience center" or "APEX center" means a program or facility operated by an LEA that:(i)provides learning experiences and instruction that replicate professional environments and workplace practices, including experiences obtained through the Utah First Credential program described in Section 53E-10-310;(ii)provides profession-based learning experiences by partnering with local industry, business, and community organizations to develop and implement student projects that address specific needs or objectives identified by those partners;(iii)aligns programs with high-skill, high-demand career pathways and postsecondary education opportunities;(iv)incorporates industry-standard tools, technologies, and methods into instruction and student work;(v)prioritizes student activities and profession-based learning projects to build durable professional skills aligned with industry standards and needs;(vi)facilitates mentorship and participation by industry professionals to guide a student and evaluate the student's work;(vii)includes an advisory board composed of industry, postsecondary, and community representatives to review program direction and ensure alignment with workforce needs; and(viii)establishes programs or activities that address gaps in training or resources within the local or regional workforce.(c)"Consortium" means two or more LEAs located within the same career and technical education geographic planning region.(b)(d)"Director" means the employee described in Subsection (3).(c)(e)"LEA" means:(i)a school district;(ii)charter school; or(iii)the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind.(d)(f)"Program" means the Catalyst CenterApplied Professional Education Experience Grant Program created in this section.(g)"Unwarranted duplication" means the overlap of resources that lead to inefficiencies, wasted resources, or a lack of coordination in providing comprehensive career and technical education programs.(2)Subject to legislative appropriation as described in Section 53F-9-204, the state board shall establish the Catalyst CenterApplied Professional Education Experience Grant Program to provide funding to an LEA to create or expand an existing catalystAPEX center.(3)The state board shall hire a director to oversee the program who:(a)has demonstrated abilities in:(i)developing and implementing innovative initiatives that transform traditional education delivery models;(ii)establishing public-private partnership frameworks that create student pathways into high-growth industries; and(iii)scaling programs that integrate real-world experiences directly into educational environments;(b)possesses expertise in:(i)managing complex multi-stakeholder initiatives across education, industry, and government sectors;(ii)implementing data-driven organizational change strategies; and(iii)developing sustainable funding models for innovative education programs;(c)maintains active leadership roles in:(i)state or national workforce innovation organizations;(ii)industry associations focused on talent development; and(iii)public-private collaboratives addressing workforce transformation;(d)reports directly to the state superintendent or a deputy superintendent to ensure appropriate program oversight and cross-departmental coordination while maintaining distinct program objectives and outcomes;(e)establishes formal collaboration mechanisms with the state board's career and technical education director to align catalystAPEX center initiatives with existing career and technical education programs; and(f)facilitates training and a collaborative network of experienced catalystAPEX center administrators and instructors across all participating LEAs.(4)The director:(a)shall:(i)administer the program;(ii)collaborate with the director of career and technical education to align the program with the career and technical education standards described in Section 53E-3-50753F-5-224;(iii)create a web-based application system to streamline submissions and allow for linked supporting documentation;(iv)ensure that grant funds are used in accordance with this section; and(v)allow grant funds to be used for planning, including:(A)feasibility studies;(B)stakeholder engagement;(C)labor market analysis;(D)initial program design and rollout; and(E)teacher and staff training specific to the delivery of profession-based learning; and(b)may collaborate with the Utah System of Higher Education and the First Credential Oversight Committee established in Section 53E-10-310.(5)An LEA applying for a grant shall demonstrate capacity for workforce alignment programs within the LEA or provide a plan to establish or enhance alignment by:(a)describing current or planned efforts to align programming with labor market needs and local industry demands;(b)outlining steps to establish or enhance partnerships with:(i)local industries and employers to ensure workforce relevance; or(ii)technical colleges, degree-granting institutions, or other postsecondary entities to support postsecondary transitions for students;(c)identifying proposed programming goals and how the goals address gaps in regional workforce training or opportunities; and(d)as the LEA determines relevant, planning to incorporate:(i)career and technical student organizations;(ii)advisory boards with representation from local industries and workforce experts;(iii)professional learning opportunities for instructors to improve workforce-focused skills; and(iv)strategies for using labor market data to refine and improve program offerings.(6)(a)An LEA may apply for a grant by submitting an application to the state board.(b)The application shall include:(i)a plan to:(A)create or expand one or more catalystAPEX centers; or(B)create or expand current career and technical education offerings within the LEA to bring the LEA's career and technical education offerings in alignment with the definition of a catalystan APEX center in Subsection (1);(ii)a detailed multi-year budget, identifying proposed expenditures for each year of the grant;(iii)justification for any capital expenditures, including plans for building use;(iv)a description of how the grant will be used to improve student outcomes, including:(A)increased access to career pathway offerings;(B)measurable improvements in career readiness, including certifications, credentials, or apprenticeships;(C)increased offerings that advance students' progression toward postsecondary education or advanced training; and(D)plans for enhanced student engagement through real-world, profession-based learning;(v)evidence of any existing partnerships with industry, including letters of collaboration;(vi)evidence of alignment with the LEA's strategic plan and local labor market needs;(vii)an explanation of how awarded funds will be used without unnecessary carryforward;(viii)a description of well-defined metrics the LEA will use to establish and measure student proficiency;(viii)(ix)as applicable, a description of how the catalystAPEX center programming will align with or enhance programs funded by the weighted pupil unit add-on described in Section 53F-2-311;(ix)(x)for applications submitted by a consortium of LEAs, a description of how:(A)the catalystAPEX center will serve students across the consortium;(B)costs and resources will be shared; and(C)economies of scale will be achieved; and(x)(xi)a description of any proposed planning activities, including expected timelines and outcomes.(7)(a)The director shall:(a)(i)prioritize an LEA that:(i)(A)proposes innovative programming supported by local labor market data;(ii)(B)collaborates with local postsecondary institutions and industry;(iii)(C)demonstrates the ability to sustain the catalystAPEX center after the grant period;(iv)(D)demonstrates a strong focus on student outcomes and workforce alignment;(v)(E)addresses gaps in high-demand, high-skill career pathways;(vi)(F)ensures funds are used to enhance programming quality before expansion; and(vii)(G)provides for a large number of students to participate in catalystAPEX center programs without limiting participation to students based on socio-economic challenges;(b)(ii)allow an LEA to apply for:(i)(A)smaller grants to bring existing career and technical education programs to high-quality standards the state board establishes;(ii)(B)larger multi-year grants for capital expenditures and program expansion; and(iii)(C)ensure that grant funding does not duplicate existing resources provided by other state or local entities;(c)(iii)consider the unique challenges and opportunities faced by rural LEAs in developing and sustaining a career and technical education program or catalystAPEX center, including:(i)(A)encouraging collaborative applications from rural consortia or regional education service agencies described in Section 53G-4-410 to maximize resources and impact; and(ii)(B)grant awards that consider both rural and non-rural applicants, recognizing regional workforce needs and program readiness; and(d)(iv)allow an LEA to propose a catalystan APEX center collocated on the campus of an institution of higher education if the application includes evidence of an agreement between the LEA and the institution of higher education.(b)The LEA:(i)shall direct the coordination with local postsecondary institutions and industry described in Subsection (7)(a)(i)(B) in a manner that the LEA determines is in the best interest of the program; and(ii)may tailor the level of collaboration described in Subsection (7)(a)(i)(B) to the individual needs of each program and of each offering within the program.(c)Nothing in Subsection (7)(a)(i)(G) allows the director to prioritize an LEA with more students over an LEA with fewer students.(8)(a)An LEA that receives a grant shall use program funds to plan for, create, establish, enhance, or expand an APEX center that:(i)provides learning experiences and instruction that:(A)replicates professional environments and workplace practices;(B)builds leadership skills;(C)builds durable professional skills;(D)allows students to advance as the students demonstrate proficiency through well-defined metrics;(E)uses student projects that address the specific needs or objectives of industry partners;(F)incorporates industry-standard tools, technologies, and methods;(G)provides opportunities for students to develop a product or presentation that the students or an industry partner shares with an audience; and(H)facilitates mentorship by industry professionals to guide and evaluate the student's work;(ii)aligns programming with labor market needs and local industry demands;(iii)establishes or enhances partnerships with:(A)local industries and employers to ensure workforce relevance; or(B)as the LEA determines, technical colleges, degree-granting institutions, or other postsecondary entities to support postsecondary transitions for students;(iv)addresses gaps in regional workforce training or opportunities;(v)incorporates:(A)career and technical student organizations as the LEA determines relevant;(B)advisory boards with representation from local industries and workforce experts;(C)professional learning opportunities for instructors to improve workforce-focused skills; and(D)strategies for using labor market data to refine and improve program offerings;(vi)focuses on the unique needs and circumstances of the local student body, community, and industry partners; and(vii)aligns with state board standards for CTE quality.(a)(b)An LEA that receives a grant:(i)may coordinate and collaborate with the Utah Board of Higher Education or an individual institution of higher education; and(ii)shall submit an annual report to the state board.(b)(c)The report described in Subsection (8)(b) shall include:(i)the use of grant funds;(ii)progress in meeting proposed goals and benchmarks, including student proficiency measurements using the well-defined metrics described in Subsection (6)(b)(viii);(iii)updates on partnerships with industry and postsecondary institutions;(iv)a demonstration of the alignment of programming with labor market data; and(v)a description of student participation and outcomes.(c)(d)The state board shall ensure that awarded funds:(i)are used in accordance with an LEA's application; and(ii)that are not used are returned for reallocation.(d)(e)Upon request, the director shall submit a report on the program to the Education Interim Committee and the Public Education Appropriations Subcommittee.(9)The Talent Ready Utah Program described in Section 53H-13-303 and the Utah Leading through Effective, Actionable, and Dynamic Education established in Section 53E-10-702, shall collaborate with the state board to develop and execute a marketing and outreach plan for the Catalyst CenterApplied Professional Education Experience Grant Program.(10)Talent Ready Utah and the Utah Leading through Effective, Actionable, and Dynamic Education shall:(a)execute the marketing and outreach plan described in Subsection (9); and(b)submit an annual report to the state board that includes:(i)the number of LEAs reached through marketing efforts;(ii)a description of outreach activities and events conducted; and(iii)feedback from LEAs regarding program accessibility and clarity.(11)The state board:(a)may provide up to 1% of the funds appropriated by the Legislature as described in Section 53F-9-204 to administer the program;(b)in fiscal year 2026, shall provide up to 1% of the funds appropriated by the Legislature as described in Section 53F-9-204 to Talent Ready Utah and the Utah Leading through Effective, Actionable, and Dynamic Education for the purposes described in Subsections (9) and (10); and(c)shall make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to implement this Subsection (11).

Section 7:
Section 7. Section 53F-9-204 is amended to read:53F-9-204Effective 07/01/26. Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted Account.(1)There is created within the Uniform School Fund a restricted account known as the "Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted Account."(2)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), the account shall be funded from the following revenue sources:(i)15% of the difference between, as determined by the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst:(A)the estimated amount of ongoing Income Tax Fund and Uniform School Fund revenue available for the Legislature to appropriate for the next fiscal year; and(B)the amount of ongoing appropriations from the Income Tax Fund and Uniform School Fund in the current fiscal year; and(ii)other appropriations as the Legislature may designate.(b)If the appropriation described in Subsection (2)(a) would cause the ongoing appropriations to the account to exceed 11% of Uniform School Fund appropriations described in Section 53F-9-201.1 for the same fiscal year, the Legislature shall appropriate only those funds necessary to ensure that the ongoing appropriations to the account equal 11% of Uniform School Fund appropriations for that fiscal year.(3)Subject to the availability of ongoing appropriations to the account, in accordance with Utah Constitution, Article X, Section 5, Subsection (4), the ongoing appropriation to the account shall be used to fund:(a)except for a year described in Subsection (3)(b) or (c), one-time appropriations to the public education system, including at least $65,000,000 to the Catalyst Center Grant Program described in Section 53E-3-507.1;(b)the Minimum School Program for a year in which Income Tax Fund revenue and Uniform School Fund revenue are insufficient to fund:(i)ongoing appropriations to the public education system; and(ii)enrollment growth and inflation estimates, as defined in Section 53F-9-201.1; and(c)the minimum basic local amount as defined in Section 53F-2-301 for a year in which the minimum basic tax rate, as defined in Section 53F-2-301, is insufficient to generate the amount described in Subsection 53F-2-301(2)(a).(4)(a)The account shall earn interest.(b)All interest earned on account money shall be deposited in the account.(5)On or before December 31, 2023, and every three years thereafter, the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall:(a)review the percentages described in Subsections (2)(a)(i) and (2)(b); and(b)recommend to the Executive Appropriations Committee any changes based on the review described in Subsection (5)(a).(6)In preparing budget bills for a given fiscal year, the Executive Appropriations Committee shall make the one-time appropriations described in Subsection (3)(a) by appropriating at least the lesser of 10% of the total amount of the one-time appropriations to:(a)the cost of providing 32 paid professional hours for teachers in accordance with Section 53F-7-203;(b)the amount to make the distribution required under Section 53F-2-527;(c)the cost of the Stipends for Future Educators Grant Program described in Section 53F-5-223; and(d)the cost of the Rural School Sports Facilities Grant Program described in Section 53F-10-303.; and(e)$100,000,000 to the Applied Professional Education Experience Grant Program described in Section 53F-5-224.(7)No later than October 15 of each year, the state board shall report to the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst an estimated cost for each of the one-time appropriations described in Subsection (6).

Section 8:
Section 8. Section 53G-8-213 is amended to read:53G-8-213Effective 05/06/26. Reintegration plan for student alleged to have committed violent felony or weapon offense.(1)As used in this section, "multidisciplinary team" means: (a)the local education agency; (b)the juvenile court; (c)the Division of Juvenile Justice and Youth Services; (d)a school safety and security specialist designated under Section 53G-8-701.6;(e)school safety and security director designated under Section 53G-8-701.8;(f)a school resource officer if applicable; and (g)any other relevant party that should be involved in a reintegration plan.(2)If a school districtan LEA receives a notification from the juvenile court or a law enforcement agency that a student was arrested for, charged with, or adjudicated in the juvenile court for a serious offense, the LEA and the relevant school shall develop a reintegration plan for the student with a multidisciplinary team, the student, and the student's parent or guardian, within five school days after the day on which the schoolLEA receives a notification.(3)The relevant school described in Subsection (2) may deny admission to the student until the school completes the reintegration plan under Subsection (2).(4)The reintegration plan under Subsection (2) shall address:(a)a behavioral intervention for the student;(b)a short-term mental health or counseling service for the student;(c)an academic intervention for the student; and(d)if the serious offense was directed at a school employee or another student within the school, notification of the reintegration plan to that school employee or student and the student's parent.(5)A school districtAn LEA may not reintegrate a student into a school where:(a)a student or staff member has a protective order against the student being reintegrated; or(b)a student or staff member is the victim of a sexual crime or forcible felony committed by the student being reintegrated.(6)(a)Notwithstanding Subsection (2), a school districtan LEA may elect to not integrate a student into a school if the student has committed, or allegedly committed, a forcible felony.(b)If a school districtan LEA elects to not integrate a student under Subsection (6)(a), the school districtLEA shall provide alternative education options for the student.(7)A reintegration plan under this section is classified as a protected record under Section 63G-2-305.(8)All other records of disclosures under this section are governed by Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act, and the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g.

Section 9:
Section 9. Section 53G-8-701.5 is amended to read:53G-8-701.5Effective 05/06/26. School safety needs assessment -- School safety personnel -- Alternative requirements.(1)(a)In accordance with Subsections (1)(c) through (e), no later than October 15 of an applicable year, an LEA shall:(i)ensure a school safety needs assessment the state security chief selects in collaboration with the school safety center is conducted in accordance with Subsection (1)(b) for each school or K-12 campus within the LEA to determine the needs and deficiencies regarding:(A)appropriate school safety personnel, including necessary supports, training, and policy creation for the personnel;(B)physical building security and safety, including required upgrades to facilities and safety technology;(C)a school's current threat and emergency response protocols, including any emergency response agreements with local law enforcement; (D)cardiac emergency preparedness, including an inventory of whether automated external defibrillators are present and accessible, maintenance status, and current staff training offerings; and(E)compliance with universal access key box requirements under Section 53G-8-805; and(ii)report the results of the school safety needs assessment for each school within the LEA to the state security chief and the School Safety Center.(b)(i)The school safety specialist described in Section 53G-8-701.6, in collaboration with the county security chief or, regarding the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind, the state security chief, and with the local law enforcement of relevant jurisdiction over the school as described in Section 53-25-701, shall conduct the school safety needs assessment for each school.(ii)A school safety and security director may fulfill the role of a school safety and security specialist in conducting the school safety needs assessment.(c)The school safety needs assessment required under Subsection (1)(a)(i) shall be conducted at least once every three years for each school or K-12 campus.(d)An LEA may implement a rotating or staggered schedule for conducting school safety needs assessments among the buildings within the LEA, provided that:(i) each school within a K-12 campus is assessed at least once every three years; and(ii)the LEA documents the rotating or staggered assessment schedule and shares this schedule with the state security chief, the School Safety Center, the county security chief regarding a school other than the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind, and the local law enforcement of relevant jurisdiction as described in Section 53-25-701.(e)The LEA shall update the assessment schedule as necessary to ensure compliance with the three-year assessment requirement under Subsection (1)(c).(f)The state board shall use the results of the school safety needs assessment for each school within an LEA to award a grant to an LEA in accordance with Section 53F-5-220.(g)Any information or record detailing a school's needs assessment results is:(i)a private, controlled, or protected record under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act; and(ii)available only to:(A)the state security chief;(B)the School Safety Center;(C)members of an LEA governing board;(D)administrators of the LEA and school the needs assessment concerns;(E)only to the extent necessary to award a grant under Section 53F-5-220, the state board;(F)the applicable school safety personnel described in Subsection (2);(G)a local law enforcement agency that would respond to the school in case of an emergency; and(H)the county security chief regarding a school other than the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind.(h)An individual who intentionally or knowingly provides the information described in Subsection (1)(g) to an individual or entity not listed in Subsection (1)(g)(ii) is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.(2)(a)An LEA shall ensure each school within the LEA has the following school safety personnel:(i)a school safety and security specialist described in Section 53G-8-701.6; and(ii)based on the results of the needs assessment described in Subsection (1), at least one of the following:(A)a school resource officer;(B)a school guardian; or(C)an armed school security guard.(b)In addition to the school safety personnel described in Subsection (2)(a), an LEA shall designate a school safety and security director described in Section 53G-8-701.8.(c)The same individual may serve in more than one of the roles listed in Subsections (2)(a) and (b) if the school notifies the School Safety Center and the state security chief of the decision to have the same individual serve in multiple roles as described in this Subsection (2).(d)An LEA may implement the requirements of Subsection (2)(a)(ii) before the LEA has completed the school safety needs assessment described in Subsection (1).(e)The state security chief in consultation with the School Safety Center shall establish a timeline for an LEA to comply with the school safety personnel requirements of this Subsection (2).(3)(a)An LEA, school administrator, or private school may apply to the state security chief for an approved alternative to the requirements described in:(i)Section 53-22-105;(ii)this section;(iii)Section 53G-8-701.6;(iv)Section 53G-8-701.8; and(v)Section 53G-8-704.(b)In approving or denying an application described in Subsection (3)(a), the state security chief may consider factors that impact a school or LEA's ability to adhere to the requirements of this section, including the school or LEA's:(i)population size;(ii)staffing needs or capacity;(iii)geographic location;(iv)available funding; or(v)general demonstration of need for an alternative to the requirements of this section.(4)A private school shall identify an individual at the private school to serve as the safety liaison with the local law enforcement of relevant jurisdiction and the state security chief.

Section 10:
Section 10. Section 53G-8-701.6 is amended to read:53G-8-701.6Effective 05/06/26. School safety and security specialist.(1)As used in this section, "principal" means the chief administrator at a public school, including:(a)a school principal;(b)a charter school director; or(c)the superintendent of the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind.(2)(a)Subject to Subsection (2)(b) and except as provided in Subsection 53G-8-701.5(3), every campus within an LEA shall designate a school safety and security specialist from the employees of the relevant campus.(b)The school safety and security specialist:(i)may not be a principal; and(ii)may be the school safety and security director at one campus within the LEA.(3)The school safety and security specialist shall:(a)report directly to the principal;(b)oversee school safety and security practices to ensure a safe and secure school environment for students and staff;(c)ensure adherence with all policies, procedures, protocols, rules, and regulations relating to school safety and security through collaborating and maintaining effective communications with the following as applicable:(i)the principal;(ii)school staff;(iii)the school resource officer;(iv)the armed school security guard;(v)the school guardian;(vi)local law enforcement;(vii)the county security chief regarding a school other than the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind;(viii)the school safety and security director;(ix)the LEA; and(x)school-based behavioral and mental health professionals;(d)in collaboration with the county security chief or, regarding the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind, the state security chief, and with the local law enforcement of relevant jurisdiction over the school as described in Section 53-25-701:(i)conduct the school safety needs assessment described in Section 53G-8-701.5; (ii)in accordance with Sections 53-25-701 and 53G-8-701.5, submit the completed assessments to the School Safety Center created in Section 53G-8-802 by October 15 of each year; and(iii)review the results of the school safety needs assessment to recommend and implement improvements to school facilities, policies, procedures, protocols, rules, and regulations relating to school safety and security;(e)participate on the multidisciplinary team that the school establishes;(f)conduct a behavioral threat assessment when the school safety and security specialist deems necessary using an evidence-based tool the state security chief recommends in consultation with the school safety center and the Office of Substance Use and Mental Health;(g)regularly monitor and report to the principal, local law enforcement, and, if applicable, the LEA superintendent or designee, security risks for the school resulting from:(i)issues with school facilities; or(ii)the implementation of practices, policies, procedures, and protocols relating to school safety and security;(h)coordinate with local first responder agencies to implement and monitor safety and security drills in accordance with policy and applicable procedures and protocols;(i)ensure that school staff, and, when appropriate, students, receive training on and remain current on the school's safety and security procedures and protocols;(j)following an event where security of the school has been significantly compromised, organize a debriefing with the individuals listed in Subsection (3)(c) following the recommendations from the state security chief, in collaboration with the School Safety Center, regarding strengthening school safety and security practices, policies, procedures, and protocols;(k)abide by any LEA, school, or law enforcement agency policy outlining the chain of command;(l)during an emergency, coordinate with the following individuals as applicable, the:(i)school resource officer;(ii)school guardians;(iii)armed school security guards;(iv)school administrators; and(v)responding law enforcement officers;(m)follow any LEA, school, or law enforcement agency student privacy policies, including state and federal privacy laws;(n)participate in an annual training the state security chief selects in consultation with the School Safety Center; and(o)remain current on:(i)a comprehensive school guideline the state security chief selects;(ii)the duties of a school safety and security specialist described in this Subsection (3); and(iii)the school's emergency response plan.(4)During an active emergency at the school, the school safety and security specialist is subordinate to any responding law enforcement officers.

Section 11:
Section 11. Section 53G-8-701.8 is amended to read:53G-8-701.8Effective 05/06/26. School safety and security director.(1)Except as provided in Subsection 53G-8-701.5(3), an LEA shall designate a school safety and security director as the LEA point of contact for the county security chief regarding a school other than the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind, local law enforcement, and the state security chief.(2)A school safety and security director shall:(a)participate in and satisfy the training requirements as follows:(i)only once, the training requirements described in Section 53-22-105 for school guardians; and(ii)the school resource officer and administrator training the state security chief approves in consultation with the School Safety Center; (b)if serving as a backup school guardian, satisfy all requirements described in 53-22-105;(c)if the designee is an employee of an LEA, participate on the multidisciplinary team the LEA establishes;(d)coordinate security responses among, if applicable, the following individuals in the LEA that employs the school safety and security director:(i)school safety and security specialists;(ii)school resource officers;(iii)armed school security guards; and(iv)school guardians; and(e)collaborate and maintain effective communications with local law enforcement, a county security chief or, regarding the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind, the state security chief, the LEA, and school-based behavioral and mental health professionals to ensure adherence with all policies, procedures, protocols, rules, and regulations relating to school safety and security.(3)A school safety and security director:(a)does not have authority to act in a law enforcement capacity; and(b)may, at the LEA that employs the director:(i)take actions necessary to prevent or abate an active threat; and(ii)temporarily detain an individual when the school safety and security director has reasonable cause to believe the individual has committed or is about to commit a forcible felony.(4)Notwithstanding Subsection 76-11-205(4), if a school safety and security director is carrying a firearm, the school safety and security director shall carry the school safety and security director's firearm in a concealed manner and may not, unless during an active threat, display or open carry a firearm while on school grounds.(5)A school may use the services of the school safety and security director on a temporary basis to satisfy the school safety personnel requirement of Subsection 53G-8-701.5(2).(6)The state security chief shall:(a)for each school safety and security director, track each school safety and security director by collecting the photograph and the name and contact information for each school safety and security director; and(b)make the information described in Subsection (6)(a) readily available to each law enforcement agency in the state categorized by LEA.

Section 12:
Section 12. Section 53G-9-702 is amended to read:53G-9-702Effective 05/06/26. Youth suicide prevention programs -- State board to develop model programs.(1)As used in the section:(a)"Elementary grades" means:(i)kindergarten through grade 5; and(ii)if the associated middle or junior high school does not include grade 6, grade 6.(b)"Intervention" means an effort to prevent a student from attempting suicide.(c)"Postvention" means mental health intervention after a suicide attempt or death to prevent or contain contagion.(d)"Program" means a youth suicide prevention program described in Subsection (2).(e)"Public education suicide prevention coordinator" means an individual designated by the state board as described in Subsection (4).(f)"Secondary grades" means:(i)grades 7 through 12; and(ii)if a middle or junior high school includes grade 6, grade 6.(g)"State suicide prevention coordinator" means the state suicide prevention coordinator described in Section 26B-5-611.(2)In collaboration with the public education suicide prevention coordinator, a school district or charter school shall implement a youth suicide prevention program, which, in collaboration with the training, programs, and initiatives described in Section 53G-9-607, shall include programs and training to address:(a)for elementary grades and secondary grades:(i)life-affirming education, including on the concepts of resiliency, healthy habits, self-care, problem solving, and conflict resolution;(ii)methods of strengthening the family; and(iii)methods of strengthening a youth's relationships in the school and community; and(b)for secondary grades:(i)prevention of youth suicide;(ii)decreasing the risk of suicide among youth who are:(A)not accepted by family for any reason, including lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, or questioning youth; or(B)suffer from bullying;(iii)youth suicide intervention; and(iv)postvention for family, students, and faculty.(3)Each school district and charter school shall ensure that the youth suicide prevention program described in Subsection (2):(a)considers appropriate coordination with the following prevention programs:(i)the prevention of bullying and cyber-bullying, as those terms are defined in Section 53G-9-601; and(ii)the prevention of underage drinking of alcohol and substance abuse under Section 53G-10-406; and(b)includes provisions to ensure that the school district or charter school promptly communicates with the parent or guardian of a student in accordance with Section 53G-9-604.(4)The state board shall:(a)designate a public education suicide prevention coordinator; and(b)in collaboration with the Department of Health and Human Services and the state suicide prevention coordinator, develop model programs to provide to school districts and charter schools:(i)program training; and(ii)resources regarding the required components described in Subsections (2)(a) and (b).(5)The public education suicide prevention coordinator shall:(a)oversee the youth suicide prevention programs of school districts and charter schools; and(b)coordinate prevention and postvention programs, services, and efforts with the state suicide prevention coordinator.(6)A public school suicide prevention program may allow school personnel to ask a student questions related to youth suicide prevention, intervention, or postvention.(7)(a)Subject to legislative appropriation and except as provided in Section 53F-2-525, the state board may distribute money to a school district or charter school to be used to implement evidence-based practices and programs, or emerging best practices and programs, for preventing suicide in the school district or charter school.(b)The state board shall ensure that an LEA's allocation of funds from the board's distribution of money under Subsection (7)(a) provides :(i)an amount equal to at least $1,000 per school.; or(ii)if appropriations are not available to provide the amount described in Subsection (7)(b)(i), a commensurately lesser amount.(c)(i)A school shall use money allocated to the school under Subsection (7)(b) to implement evidence-based practices and programs, or emerging best practices and programs, for preventing suicide.(ii)Each school may select the evidence-based practices and programs, or emerging best practices and programs, for preventing suicide that the school implements.(8)An LEA may not charge indirect costs to the program.

Section 13:
Section 13.  Effective Date.(1)Except as provided in Subsection (2), this bill takes effect May 6, 2026.(2)The actions affecting Section 53F-9-204 Effective 07/01/26 take effect on July 1, 2026.

Section 14:
Section 14.  Coordinating S.B. 34 with H.B. 1.If S.B. 34, Public Education Revisions, and H.B. 1, Public Education Base Budget Amendments, both pass and become law, the Legislature intends that, on July 1, 2026, the amendments to Subsection 53F-9-204(6)(e) in S.B. 34 supersede the amendments to Subsection 53F-9-204(6)(e) in H.B. 1.